California statutes. Elections Code
The elections official shall include with the ballot a declaration to be signed by the military or overseas voter that a material misstatement of fact in completing the ballot may be grounds for a conviction of perjury under the laws of this state or the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 21.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3119.

Elections officials shall implement an electronic free access system by which a military or overseas voter may determine by telephone, electronic mail, or Internet whether the military or overseas voter’s ballot has been received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 22.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3120.

The elections official shall request an electronic mail address from each military or overseas voter who registers to vote. A military or overseas voter who provides an electronic mail address may request that his or her application for a ballot be considered a standing request for electronic delivery of a ballot for all elections conducted in the jurisdiction in which he or she is eligible to vote. An elections official shall provide for electronic delivery of a ballot to a military or overseas voter who makes a standing request for all elections conducted in the jurisdiction in which he or she is eligible to vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 649, Sec. 1.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3121.

(a) As soon as practicable before an election, each elections official shall publish on his or her Internet Web site a list of all of the ballot measures and federal, state, and local offices that, as of that date, the elections official expects to be on the ballot on the date of the election. The list shall also contain specific instructions for how a voter is to indicate on a federal write-in absentee ballot the voter’s choice for each office to be filled and for each ballot measure to be contested.

(b) A military or overseas voter may request a copy of the list described in subdivision (a). The elections official shall send the list to the voter by facsimile,
 electronic mail, or regular mail, as the voter requests.

(c) Not later than 60 days before a regularly scheduled election and as soon as practicable before a special election, the elections official shall update on his or her Internet Web site the list described in subdivision (a) with the certified candidates for each office and certified ballot measures and make the updated list publicly available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 24.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.

(a) If a military or overseas voter’s mistake or omission in the completion of a document under this chapter does not prevent determining whether a military or overseas voter is eligible to vote, the mistake or omission does not invalidate the document. In a write-in ballot authorized by this chapter, if the intention of the voter is discernible under this state’s uniform definition of what constitutes a vote and the ballot is eligible to be counted pursuant to Sections 3019 and 3106, an abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the name of a
 candidate or a political party shall be accepted as a valid vote.

(b) An authentication, other than the declaration specified in Section 3106 or 3118 or the declaration on the federal postcard application and federal write-in absentee ballot, is not required for execution of a document under this chapter. The declaration and any information in the declaration may be compared with information on file to ascertain the validity of the document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 560, Sec. 4.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3123.

A court may issue an injunction or grant other equitable relief appropriate to ensure substantial compliance with, or enforce, this chapter on application by either of the following:

(a) A military or overseas voter.

(b) An elections official in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 26.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS [4000. - 4108.]



CHAPTER 1. Conditions for Mail Ballot Election [4000. - 4008.]

4000.

A local, special, or consolidated election may be conducted wholly by mail provided that all of the following conditions apply:

(a) The governing body of the local agency authorizes the use of mailed ballots for the election.

(b) The election is held on an established mailed ballot election date pursuant to Section 1500.

(c) The election is one of the following:

(1) An election in which no more than 1,000 registered voters are eligible to participate.

(2) An election on a measure or measures restricted to (A) the imposition of special taxes, or (B) expenditure limitation overrides, or (C) both (A) and (B), in a city, county, or special district with 5,000 or less registered voters calculated as of the time of the last report of registration by the county elections official to the Secretary of State.

(3) An election on the issuance of a general obligation water bond in accordance with Section 12944.5 of the Water Code.

(4) An election of the Directors of the Monterey Peninsula Water Management District as authorized in Section 122 of Chapter 527 of the Statutes of 1977, known as the Monterey Peninsula Water Management District Law.

(5) An election of the Aliso Water Management Agency, or its affected member agencies, pursuant to Sections 13416 and 13417 of the Water Code.

(6) An election of the San Jacinto Mountain Area Water Study Agency pursuant to Sections 13416 and 13417 of the Water Code.

(7) An election of the San Lorenzo Valley Water District pursuant to Sections 13416 and 13417 of the Water Code.

(8) An election or assessment ballot proceeding required or authorized by Article XIIIC or XIIID of the California Constitution. However, when an assessment ballot proceeding is conducted by mail pursuant to this section, the following rules apply:

(A) The proceeding shall be denominated an “assessment ballot proceeding” rather than an election.

(B) Ballots shall be denominated “assessment ballots.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

Notwithstanding Section 4000, a special district may conduct its elections by mail in accordance with Sections 1500, 4104, 4105, and 4108.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 86, Sec. 1.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever any district has adopted the all-mailed ballot procedure for conducting general district elections pursuant to Section 4104 and any other election is scheduled to be held in territory that is the same or partly the territory of the district on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the odd-numbered year, the district may, by resolution of the governing board, revoke the adoption of the all-mailed ballot procedure and order the general district election consolidated with the other election pursuant to Section 10402.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

(a) “Small city” means a city with a population of 100,000 or less, as determined by the annual city total population rankings by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.

(b) “Eligible entity” means a school district or a special district.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 1500 and 4000, an election in a small city or an eligible entity may be conducted wholly as an all-mail ballot election, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The legislative body of the small city or the governing body of the eligible entity, by resolution, authorizes the use of mailed ballots for the election.

(2) The election is a special election to fill a vacancy in the legislative body or governing body.

(3) The election is not held on the same date as a statewide primary or general election.

(4) The election is not consolidated with any other election.

(5) The return of voted mail ballots is subject to Section 3017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 86, Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct any election as an all-mailed ballot election if all of the following apply:

(1) (A) At least two ballot dropoff locations are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held or the number of ballot dropoff locations are fixed in a manner so that there is at least one ballot dropoff location provided for every 15,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election, whichever results in more ballot dropoff locations. For purposes of this subparagraph, a vote center that includes an exterior ballot drop box
 counts only as a single ballot dropoff location. Ballot dropoff locations shall comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3025.

(B) A ballot dropoff location provided for under this section consists of a secure, accessible, and locked ballot box located as near as possible to established public transportation routes and that is able to receive voted ballots. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be an accessible, secured, exterior drop box that is available for a minimum of 12 hours per day including regular business hours.

(2) (A) The county
 elections official permits a voter residing in the county to do any of the following at a vote center:

(i) Return, or vote and return, the voter’s vote by mail ballot.

(ii) Register to vote, update the voter’s voter registration, and vote pursuant to Section 2170.

(iii) Receive and vote a provisional ballot pursuant to Section 3016 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division 14.

(iv) Receive a replacement ballot upon verification that a ballot for the same election has not been received from the voter by the county elections official. If the county elections official is unable to determine if a ballot for the same election has been received from
 the voter, the county elections official may issue a provisional ballot.

(v) Vote a regular, provisional, or replacement ballot using accessible voting equipment that provides for a private and independent voting experience.

(B) Each vote center shall have at least three voting machines that are accessible to voters with disabilities.

(3) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, and on each of the three days before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election. At least 90 percent of the
 number of vote centers required by this subparagraph shall be open for all four days during the required times. Up to 10 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph may be open for less than four days if at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters on each day.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 20,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided on the day of the election and on each of the three days before the election within the jurisdiction where the election is held.

(4) (A) Beginning 10 days before the day of the election and continuing daily up to and including the fourth day before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one
 vote center is provided for every 50,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 50,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held.

(C) The vote centers provided under this section are established in accordance with the accessibility requirements described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 12280) of Chapter 3 of Division 12, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101
 et seq.).

(D) The vote centers provided under this section are equitably distributed across the county so as to afford maximally convenient options for voters and are established at accessible locations as near as possible to established public transportation routes. The vote centers shall be equipped with voting units or systems that are accessible to individuals with disabilities and that provide the same opportunity for access and participation as is provided to voters who are not disabled, including the ability to vote privately and independently in accordance with Sections 12280 and 19240.

(E) (i) The vote centers provided under this section have an electronic mechanism for the county elections official to immediately access, at a minimum, all of the
 following voter registration data:

(I) Name.

(II) Address.

(III) Date of birth.

(IV) Language preference.

(V) Party preference.

(VI) Precinct.

(VII) Whether or not the voter has been issued a vote by mail ballot and whether or not a ballot has been received by the county elections official.

(ii) The electronic mechanism used to access voter registration data shall not be connected in any way to a voting
 system.

(5) A method is available for voters with disabilities to request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).

(6) (A) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, election boards for the vote centers established under this section meet the requirements for eligibility and composition pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 4 of Division 12.

(B) Each vote center provides language assistance in all languages required in the jurisdiction under
 subdivision (c) of Section 12303 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) in a manner that enables voters of the applicable language minority groups to participate effectively in the electoral process. Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance in English and all other languages for which language assistance is required to be provided in the jurisdiction under subdivision (c) of Section 12303 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(i) If a vote center is located in, or adjacent to, a precinct, census tract, or other defined geographical subsection required to establish language requirements under subdivision (c) of Section 12303 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec.
 10101 et seq.), or if it is identified as needing language assistance through the public input process described in clause (ii), the county elections official shall ensure that the vote center is staffed by election board members who speak the required language. If the county elections official is unable to recruit election board members who speak the required language, alternative methods of effective language assistance shall be provided by the county elections official.

(ii) The county elections official shall solicit public input regarding which vote centers should be staffed by election board members who are fluent in a language in addition to English pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12303 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(iii) The county elections official shall provide notice in the sample ballot, in vote by mail materials, and on the official’s internet website of the specific language services available at each vote center.

(iv) Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance services, including any language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of
 State.

(C) Each vote center provides election materials translated in all languages required in the jurisdiction under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(D) Each vote center provides reasonable modifications and auxiliary aids and services as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).

(7) (A) Beginning 10 days before the election, the county elections official maintains, in an electronic format, an index of voters who have done any of the following at one of the vote centers established
 pursuant to this section:

(i) Registered to vote or updated the voter’s voter registration.

(ii) Received and voted a provisional ballot or replacement ballot.

(iii) Voted a ballot using equipment at the vote center.

(B) The index required by subparagraph (A) includes the same information for each voter as is required to be included on copies of the roster that are posted pursuant to Section 14294. The index required by subparagraph (A) shall be updated continuously during any time that a vote center is open in the jurisdiction.

(8) (A) No later than 29 days before the day of the election,
 the county elections official begins mailing to registered voters a vote by mail ballot packet that includes a return envelope with instructions for the use and return of the vote by mail ballot. The county elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each person who is registered to vote on the 29th day before the day of the election and five days for each subsequent registered voter. The county elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in the county in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.

(B) The county elections official delivers to each voter, with either the sample ballot sent pursuant to Section 13303 or with the vote by mail ballot packet, all of the following:

(i) A notice,
 translated in all languages required under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), that informs voters of all of the following:

(I) An all-mailed ballot election is being conducted and each eligible voter will be issued a vote by mail ballot by mail.

(II) The voter may cast a vote by mail ballot in person at a vote center during the times and days specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) or on election day.

(III) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights
 Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) or a facsimile copy of the ballot printed in a language other than English pursuant to Section 14201.

(IV) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send or deliver a ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).

(V) Language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.

(ii) A list of the ballot dropoff locations and vote centers established pursuant to this section, including the
 dates and hours they are open. The list shall also be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(iii) A postage-paid postcard that the voter may return to the county elections official for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English or for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format.

(C) Upon request, the county elections official provides written voting materials to voters with disabilities in an accessible format, as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).

(9) (A) The county elections official establishes a language accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of representatives of language minority communities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).

(B) The county elections official establishes a voting accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of voters with disabilities. The committee shall be established
 and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).

(C) In a county with more than 500,000 registered voters, the county elections official establishes a voter education and outreach advisory committee that is comprised of voter engagement, education, and community outreach advocates. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).

(D) A county with fewer than 50,000 registered voters may establish a joint advisory
 committee for language minority communities and voters with disabilities.

(10) (A) The county elections official develops a draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section in consultation with the public, including all of the following:

(i) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the
 meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives, advocates, and other stakeholders representing each community for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(ii) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives from the disability community and community organizations and
 individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities.

(iii) In a county with more than 500,000 registered voters, one meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the
 meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes voter education and outreach advocates.

(B) The county elections official, when developing the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, considers, at a minimum, all of the following:

(i) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to public transportation.

(ii) Vote center and
 ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with historically low vote by mail usage.

(iii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to population centers.

(iv) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to language minority communities.

(v) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to voters with disabilities.

(vi) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with low rates of household vehicle ownership.

(vii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to low-income communities.

(viii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities of eligible voters who are not registered to vote and may need access to same day voter registration.

(ix) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to geographically isolated populations, including Native American reservations.

(x) Access to accessible and free parking at vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.

(xi) The distance and time a voter must travel by car or public transportation to a vote center and ballot dropoff location.

(xii) The need for alternate methods for voters with disabilities for whom vote by mail ballots are not accessible to cast a ballot.

(xiii) Traffic patterns near vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.

(xiv) The need for mobile vote centers in addition to the number of vote centers established pursuant to this section.

(xv) Vote center location on a public or private university or college campus.

(C) The county elections official publicly notices the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and accepts public comments on the draft plan for at least 14 days before the public hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (D).

(D) (i) Following the 14-day review period
 required by subparagraph (C), the county elections official holds a public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments. The meeting shall be publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting on the internet websites of the clerk of the county board of supervisors and the county elections official, or, if neither the clerk of the county board of supervisors nor the county elections official maintain an internet website, in the office of the county elections official.

(ii) After the public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments, the county elections official shall consider any public comments the official receives from the public and shall
 amend the draft plan in response to the public comments to the extent the official deems appropriate. The county elections official shall publicly notice the amended draft plan and shall accept public comments on the amended draft plan for at least 14 days before the county elections official may adopt the amended draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (E).

(E) (i) No later than 120 days before the election and following the 14-day review and comment period required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (D), the county elections official
 shall adopt a final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. The county elections official shall submit the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) to the Secretary of State for approval.

(ii) The Secretary of State shall approve, approve with modifications, or reject a voter education and outreach plan submitted pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (I) within 14 days after the plan is submitted by the county elections official.

(iii) The draft plan, the amended draft plan, and the adopted final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant
 to this section shall be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), and the Secretary of State’s internet website in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(F) Public meetings held pursuant to this paragraph shall, upon request, provide auxiliary aids and services to ensure effective communication with people with disabilities.

(G) Within two years of the adoption of the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections
 official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. Every four years thereafter, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section.

(H) (i) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section no more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section.

(ii) With reasonable
 public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section if the official provides at least 30 days to accept public comments on the amended plan.

(I) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, includes all of the following:

(i) A voter education and outreach plan that is approved by the Secretary of State and that includes all of the following:

(I) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television that serve language minority communities for purposes of informing
 voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.

(II) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television for purposes of informing voters of the availability of a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format and the process for requesting such a ballot.

(III) A description of how the county elections official will have a community presence to educate voters regarding the provisions of this section.

(IV) A description of the accessible information that will be publicly available on the accessible internet website of the county elections official.

(V) A description of the method used by the county elections official to identify language minority voters.

(VI) A description of how the county elections official will educate and communicate the provisions of this section to the public, including:

(ia) Communities for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.). The county elections official shall hold at least one bilingual voter education workshop for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting
 Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(ib) The disability community, including organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities. The county elections official shall hold at least one voter education workshop to increase accessibility and participation of eligible voters with disabilities.

(VII) A description of how the county will spend the necessary resources on voter education and outreach to ensure that voters are fully informed about the election. This description shall include information about the amount of money the county plans to spend on voter education and outreach activities under the plan, and how that compares to the amount of money spent on voter education and outreach in recent similar elections in the
 same jurisdiction.

(VIII) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve English-speaking citizens for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. Outreach made under this subclause shall include access for voters who are deaf or hard of hearing and voters who are blind or visually impaired.

(IX) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve non-English-speaking citizens for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) for
 purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.

(X) At least two direct contacts with voters for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. The two direct contacts are in addition to any other required contacts, including, but not limited to, sample ballots and the delivery of vote by mail ballots.

(ia) After the first six statewide elections conducted pursuant to this section, a county elections official may make one direct contact if the county elections official does both of the following:

(Ia) Revises the plan for the administration of elections pursuant to subparagraph (G) to explain how at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact will be used on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.

(Ib) Spends at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.

(ib) If direct contact is made by mail, the county elections
 official must mail at least one copy of each direct contact to voters with the same surname and postal address, in each language requested.

(ic) At least one direct contact shall be made
 with voters
 during an
 election that is conducted either in a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters or conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) within 30 days of a regularly scheduled statewide election.

(id) Notwithstanding sub-subclause (ia), a county elections official shall make at least two direct contacts with a voter for the first six statewide elections that the voter is registered to vote in the county.

(ii) A description of how a voter with disabilities may request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that a voter with disabilities can mark privately and independently.

(iii) A
 description of how the county elections official will address significant disparities in voter accessibility and participation identified in the report required by subdivision (g).

(iv) A description of the methods and standards that the county elections official will use to ensure the security of voting conducted at vote centers.

(v) Information about estimated short-term and long-term costs and savings from conducting elections pursuant to this section as compared to recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction that were not conducted pursuant to this section.

(vi) To the extent available at the time of publication, information on all of the following:

(I) The total number of vote centers to be established.

(II) The total number of ballot dropoff locations to be established.

(III) The location of each vote center.

(IV) The location of each ballot dropoff location and whether it is inside or outside.

(V) A map of the locations of each vote center and ballot dropoff location.

(VI) The hours of operation for each vote center.

(VII) The hours of operation for each ballot dropoff location.

(VIII) The security and
 contingency plans that would be
 implemented by the county elections official to do both of the following:

(ia) Prevent a disruption of the vote center process.

(ib) Ensure that the election is properly conducted if a disruption occurs.

(IX) The number of election board members and the number of bilingual election board members and the languages spoken.

(X) The services provided to voters with disabilities, including, but not limited to, the type and number of accessible voting machines and reasonable modifications at each vote center.

(XI) The design, layout, and placement of equipment inside each vote center that
 protects each voter’s right to cast a private and independent ballot.

(vii) A toll-free voter assistance hotline that is accessible to voters who are deaf or hard of hearing, and that is maintained by the county elections official that is operational no later than 29 days before the day of the election until 5 p.m. on the day after the election. The toll-free voter assistance hotline shall provide assistance to voters in all languages in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(J) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section is posted in a format that is accessible to persons with disabilities on the
 internet website of the Secretary of State and on the internet website of the county elections official.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct a special election as an all-mailed ballot election under this section if all of the following apply:

(1) The county elections official has done either of the following:

(A) Previously conducted an election as an all-mailed ballot election in accordance with subdivision (a).

(B) Adopted a final plan for the administration of elections pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a), in which case the county elections official shall complete all activities
 provided for in the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) before the day of the special election.

(2) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, at least one vote center is provided for every 30,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.

(3) (A) Not less than 10 days before the day of the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 60,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.

(4) (A) At least one ballot dropoff location is provided for every 15,000 registered voters. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be located within the jurisdiction where the